Maine, session 132, LD538.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §13794, first ¶, as amended by PL 2019, c. 34, §5, is further
amended to read:
Every Except as authorized in this section, every drug dispensed pursuant to
prescription, whether for a legend drug or not, must carry on the label the following
information: the prescription number; the date of filling; the patient's name; directions for
use; the name and strength of the drug and the amount dispensed, including either the brand
name of the drug or, if a generic and therapeutically equivalent drug or interchangeable
biological product is dispensed the label must be in accordance with section 13781; the
beyond use date of the drug; the name of the practitioner prescribing the drug; and the
name, address and telephone number of the pharmacy where the prescription was
compounded and dispensed. For purposes of this section, "beyond use date" means a date
beyond which the contents of the prescription are not recommended to be used.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §13794, as amended by PL 2019, c. 34, §5, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
At the request of the practitioner prescribing the drug, the label for mifepristone,
misoprostol and their generic alternatives may include the name of the health care facility
that the practitioner is associated with instead of the name of the practitioner.
Page 1 - 132LR0749(03)